Maine, session 132, LD2092.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §1825-B, sub-§2, ¶F, as amended by PL 2023, c. 516, Pt. A, §1,
is further amended to read:
F. The procurement of goods or services involves expenditures of $25,000 or less, in
which case the Director of the Bureau of General Services may accept informal written
quotes or bids; or
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §1825-B, sub-§2, ¶G, as amended by PL 1999, c. 105, §3, is
further amended to read:
G. The procurement of goods or services involves expenditures of $10,000 or less, and
procurement from a single source is the most economical, effective and appropriate
means of fulfilling a demonstrated need.;
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §1825-B, sub-§2, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. The Chief Information Officer, after reasonable investigation, has determined that
the procurement of information technology products or services through the
procurement offerings to state and local governments from the United States General
Services Administration is in the best interest of the State; or
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §1825-B, sub-§2, ¶I is enacted to read:
I. The Chief Information Officer, after reasonable investigation, has determined that
the procurement of information security or cybersecurity products or services on a
retainer basis is necessary to detect, prevent and respond to cyberattacks.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §1972, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Cyberattack. "Cyberattack" has the same meaning as in Title 37-B, section 703,
subsection 1-A.
Sec. 6. 5 MRSA §1972, sub-§4-B is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2678(03)

4-B. Cybersecurity. "Cybersecurity" means the protection of information and
communications technology infrastructure, systems and services affecting the enterprise
and the State's critical infrastructure, whether physical or nonphysical, by detecting,
preventing and responding to cyberattacks.
Sec. 7. 5 MRSA §1972, sub-§7-A is enacted to read:
7-A. Information security. "Information security" means the ability to protect or
defend the information and communications technology infrastructure, systems or services
affecting the enterprise or the State's critical infrastructure, whether physical or
nonphysical, from unauthorized access, use, disclosure, disruption, modification or
destruction to provide confidentiality, integrity and availability.
Sec. 8. 5 MRSA §1973, sub-§5, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 388, §14, is
amended to read:
B. Approve the Division of Purchases' standards and evaluation procedures of the
division of purchases within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Bureau of General Services for standard information and telecommunications
technology acquisitions and contracts.
Sec. 9. 5 MRSA §1974, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 388, §14, is amended to
read:
1. Approve the acquisition and use of equipment. The Chief Information Officer,
or the Chief Information Officer's designee, working with the Division of Purchases
division of purchases within the Department of Administrative and Financial Services,
Bureau of General Services and in accordance with written standards established by this
chapter, shall approve acquisition and use of all data processing and telecommunications
services, equipment and systems by state agencies.
Sec. 10. 5 MRSA §1974, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 388, §14, is amended
to read:
2. Develop training and development programs in data processing. The Chief
Information Officer, or the Chief Information Officer's designee, is responsible for
developing training and development programs for state employees in data processing and
for the implementation of these programs.
Sec. 11. 5 MRSA §1974, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2005, c. 12, Pt. SS, §12, is
further amended to read:
3. Develop and administer written standards for data processing and
telecommunications. The Chief Information Officer, or the Chief Information Officer's
designee, shall develop and administer written standards for data processing and
telecommunications. These written standards pertain to:
A. Acquisition of equipment;
B. Acquisition of computer software and systems;
C. Development of computer systems and computer programs;
D. Computer operations; and
Page 2 - 132LR2678(03)

D-1. Information security and cybersecurity policies, procedures and related
operations; and
E. Any other standards determined necessary by the Chief Information Officer and the
board.
Sec. 12. 5 MRSA §1975, as amended by PL 2005, c. 12, Pt. SS, §15, is further
amended to read:
§1975. Noncompliance
The purchase of data processing equipment, software or services or internal systems
development efforts may not be made except in accordance with this chapter. An agency
may not purchase any data processing equipment, software or services without the prior
written approval of the commissioner or the Chief Information Officer or the Chief
Information Officer's designee. The State Controller may not authorize payment for data
processing equipment, software or services without evidence of prior approval of the
purchases by the commissioner or the Chief Information Officer or the Chief Information
Officer's designee.
1. Noncompliance defined. A state agency is in noncompliance with this chapter if
the agency:
A. Purchases data processing equipment, software or services in noncompliance with
this chapter; or
B. Fails to adhere to the data processing standards established by the commissioner
and the Chief Information Officer or the Chief Information Officer's designee.
2. Penalty. Any state agency found to be in noncompliance as defined in this section
is prohibited from acquiring or purchasing data processing equipment, software and
services until the commissioner or the Chief Information Officer determines that the state
agency is in compliance with this chapter.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the commissioner or the Chief Information
Officer may act to acquire or purchase data processing equipment, software and services
to maintain or meet the emergency needs of a state agency.
3. Cybersecurity services. Notwithstanding the requirements of sections 1553 and
1825-B, or any other statutory or regulatory provisions to the contrary, the Chief
Information Officer, after reasonable investigation, may procure cybersecurity services on
a retainer basis when determined necessary to ensure the State is prepared to detect, prevent
and respond to cyberattacks.
Page 3 - 132LR2678(03)